Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 40 Healthcare Claims Under Specified Standards

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1989, chs. 74, 246 and 278, each enacted a chapter 39 of this title. The provisions enacted by ch. 278 have been redesignated as chapter 40, and the provisions enacted by ch. 74 have been redesignated as chapter 41.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

44A Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 1724 to 1733.

46 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 1085 to 1244.